test/src/morphology/V-aqilw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - a’ilõ: # Verb 51 'eng /est joosta/fin' - full paradigm
     a’ilõ+V+Inf: a’ilõ
     a’ilõ+V+Ger: a’ilõs
     a’ilõ+V+Sup: a’ilõm
     a’ilõ+V+Sup+Ine: a’ilõmõs
     a’ilõ+V+Sup+Ela: a’ilõmõst
     a’ilõ+V+Sup+Tra: a’ilõmõks
     a’ilõ+V+Sup+Abe: a’ilõmõt
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: a’ilõb
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: a’ilõt
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: a’ilõbõd
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: a’iliz
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [a’ilizt, a’iliztõ]
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [a’ilizt, a’iliztõ]
     a’ilõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: a’il
     a’ilõ+V+Cond+Sg3: a’ilõks
     a’ilõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: a’il
     a’ilõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: a’il
     a’ilõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: a’ilõgid
     a’ilõ+V+Jus+Sg3: a’ilõg
     a’ilõ+V+Quo+Sg3: a’iliji
     a’ilõ+V+ActPrfPrc: a’ilõn
     a’ilõ+V+PssPrfPrc: a’ildõd
